Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1080.
do enact as follows:SB1080,16Section 1. 66.1014 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1080,2,2166.1014 (title) Limits on residential Residential dwelling rental 2prohibited.SB1080,23Section 2. 66.1014 (1) (intro.) and (a) of the statutes are consolidated, 4renumbered 66.1014 (1) and amended to read:SB1080,2,6566.1014 (1) In this section: (a) “Political, “political subdivision” means any 6city, village, town, or county.SB1080,37Section 3. 66.1014 (1) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB1080,48Section 4. 66.1014 (2) (a) of the statutes is repealed.SB1080,59Section 5. 66.1014 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB1080,610Section 6. 66.1014 (2) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB1080,711Section 7. 66.1014 (2) (d) 1. of the statutes is repealed.SB1080,812Section 8. 66.1014 (2) (d) 2. of the statutes is renumbered 66.1014 (2m).SB1080,2,1313